Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2512.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.86 RCW to read as follows:A broker may not marketÂ the sale or leaseÂ of residential real estate to a limited or exclusive group of prospective buyers or brokers, or any combination thereof, unlessÂ the real estate isÂ concurrently marketed to the general public and all other brokers, except as reasonably necessary to protect the health or safety of the owner or occupant.Sec. 2. RCW 18.86.031 and 2013 c 58 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:A violation of either RCW 18.86.030 or section 1 of this act is a violation of RCW 18.85.361.Sec. 3. RCW 18.86.120 and 2023 c 318 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:The pamphlet required under RCW 18.86.030(1)(f) shall be formatted so it can be easily reviewed by a buyer or seller, including a legible font and font size. The pamphlet shall be in the following form:Real Estate Brokerage in WashingtonIntroductionThis pamphlet provides general information about real estate brokerage and summarizes the laws related to real estate brokerage relationships. It describes a real estate broker's duties to the seller/landlord and buyer/tenant. Detailed and complete information about real estate brokerage relationships is available in chapter 18.86 RCW.If you have any questions about the information in this pamphlet, contact your broker or the designated broker of your broker's firm.Licensing and Supervision of BrokersTo provide real estate brokerage services in Washington, a broker must be licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW and licensed with a real estate firm, which also must be licensed. Each real estate firm has a designated broker who is responsible for supervising the brokers licensed with the firm. Some firms may have branch offices that are supervised by a branch manager and some firms may delegate certain supervisory duties to one or more managing brokers.The Washington State Department of Licensing is responsible for enforcing all laws and rules relating to the conduct of real estate firms and brokers.Agency RelationshipIn an agency relationship, a broker is referred to as an "agent" and the seller/landlord and buyer/tenant is referred to as the "principal." For simplicity, in this pamphlet, seller includes landlord, and buyer includes tenant.For SellersA real estate firm and broker must enter into a written services agreement with a seller to establish an agency relationship. The firm will then appoint one or more brokers to be agents of the seller. The firm's designated broker and any managing broker responsible for the supervision of those brokers are also agents of the seller.For BuyersA real estate firm and broker(s) who perform real estate brokerage services for a buyer establish an agency relationship by performing those services. The firm's designated broker and any managing broker responsible for the supervision of that broker are also agents of the buyer. A written services agreement between the buyer and the firm must be entered into before, or as soon as reasonably practical after, a broker begins rendering real estate brokerage services to the buyer.For both Buyer and Seller - as a Limited Dual AgentA limited dual agent provides limited representation to both the buyer and the seller in a transaction. Limited dual agency requires the consent of each principal in a written services agreement and may occur in two situations: (1) When the buyer and the seller are represented by the same broker, in which case the broker's designated broker and any managing broker responsible for the supervision of that broker are also limited dual agents; and (2) when the buyer and the seller are represented by different brokers in the same firm, in which case each broker solely represents the principal the broker was appointed to represent, but the broker's designated broker and any managing broker responsible for the supervision of those brokers are limited dual agents.Duration of Agency RelationshipOnce established, an agency relationship continues until the earliest of the following:(1) Completion of performance by the broker;(2) Expiration of the term agreed upon by the parties;(3) Termination of the relationship by mutual agreement of the parties; or(4) Termination of the relationship by notice from either party to the other. However, such a termination does not affect the contractual rights of either party.Written Services AgreementA written services agreement between the firm and principal must contain the following:(1) The term (duration) of the agreement;(2) Name of the broker(s) appointed to act as an agent for the principal;(3) Whether the agency relationship is exclusive (which does not allow the principal to enter into an agency relationship with another firm during the term) or nonexclusive (which allows the principal to enter into an agency relationship with multiple firms at the same time);(4) Whether the principal consents to limited dual agency;(5) The terms of compensation;(6) In an agreement with a buyer, whether the broker agrees to show a property when there is no agreement or offer by any party or firm to pay compensation to the broker's firm; and(7) Any other agreements between the parties.A Broker's Duties to All PartiesA broker owes the following duties to all parties in a transaction:(1) To exercise reasonable skill and care;(2) To deal honestly and in good faith;(3) To timely present all written offers, written notices, and other written communications to and from either party;(4) To disclose all existing material facts known by the broker and not apparent or readily ascertainable to a party. A material fact includes information that substantially adversely affects the value of the property or a party's ability to perform its obligations in a transaction, or operates to materially impair or defeat the purpose of the transaction. However, a broker does not have any duty to investigate matters that the broker has not agreed to investigate;(5) To account in a timely manner for all money and property received from or on behalf of either party;(6) To provide this pamphlet to all parties to whom the broker renders real estate brokerage services and to any unrepresented party;(7) To disclose in writing who the broker represents; and(8) To disclose in writing any terms of compensation offered by a party or a real estate firm to a real estate firm representing another party.Property Must Be Marketed PubliclyBrokers who represent a seller must market residential property to all members of the public and all other brokers and may not market the property to an exclusive group of buyers or brokers only, unless the health or safety of the owner or occupant requires.A Broker's Duties to the Buyer or SellerA broker owes the following duties to their principal (either the buyer or seller):(1) To be loyal to their principal by taking no action that is adverse or detrimental to their principal's interest in a transaction;(2) To timely disclose to their principal any conflicts of interest;(3) To advise their principal to seek expert advice on matters relating to the transaction that are beyond the broker's expertise;(4) To not disclose any confidential information from or about their principal; and(5) To make a good faith and continuous effort to find a property for the buyer or to find a buyer for the seller's property, until the principal has entered a contract for the purchase or sale of property or as agreed otherwise in writing.Limited Dual Agent DutiesA limited dual agent may not advocate terms favorable to one principal to the detriment of the other principal. A broker, acting as a limited dual agent, owes the following duties to both the buyer and seller:(1) To take no action that is adverse or detrimental to either principal's interest in a transaction;(2) To timely disclose to both principals any conflicts of interest;(3) To advise both principals to seek expert advice on matters relating to the transaction that are beyond the limited dual agent's expertise;(4) To not disclose any confidential information from or about either principal; and(5) To make a good faith and continuous effort to find a property for the buyer and to find a buyer for the seller's property, until the principals have entered a contract for the purchase or sale of property or as agreed otherwise in writing.CompensationIn any real estate transaction, a firm's compensation may be paid by the seller, the buyer, a third party, or by sharing the compensation between firms. To receive compensation from any party, a firm must have a written services agreement with the party the firm represents (or provide a "Compensation Disclosure" to the buyer in a transaction for commercial real estate).A services agreement must contain the following regarding compensation:(1) The amount the principal agrees to compensate the firm for broker's services as an agent or limited dual agent;(2) The principal's consent, if any, and any terms of such consent, to compensation sharing between firms and parties; and(3) The principal's consent, if any, and any terms of such consent, to compensation of the firm by more than one party.Short SalesA "short sale" is a transaction where the seller's proceeds from the sale are insufficient to cover seller's obligations at closing (e.g., the seller's outstanding mortgage is greater than the sale price). If a sale is a short sale, the seller's real estate firm must disclose to the seller that the decision by any beneficiary or mortgagee, to release its interest in the property for less than the amount the seller owes to allow the sale to proceed, does not automatically relieve the seller of the obligation to pay any debt or costs remaining at closing, including real estate firms' compensation.Sec. 4. RCW 49.60.222 and 2020 c 52 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:(1) It is an unfair practice for any person, whether acting for himself, herself, or another, because of sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, families with children status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability:(a) To refuse to engage in a real estate transaction with a person;(b) To discriminate against a person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of a real estate transaction or in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection therewith;(c) To refuse to receive or to fail to transmit a bona fide offer to engage in a real estate transaction from a person;(d) To refuse to negotiate for a real estate transaction with a person;(e) To represent to a person that real property is not available for inspection, sale, rental, or lease when in fact it is so available, or to fail to bring a property listing to his or her attention, or to refuse to permit the person to inspect real property;(f) To discriminate in the sale or rental, or to otherwise make unavailable or deny a dwelling, to any person; or to a person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling after it is sold, rented, or made available; or to any person associated with the person buying or renting;(g) To make, print, circulate, post, or mail, or cause to be so made or published a statement, advertisement, or sign, or to use a form of application for a real estate transaction, or to make a record or inquiry in connection with a prospective real estate transaction, which indicates, directly or indirectly, an intent to make a limitation, specification, or discrimination with respect thereto;(h) To offer, solicit, accept, use, or retain a listing of real property with the understanding that a person may be discriminated against in a real estate transaction or in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection therewith;(i) To expel a person from occupancy of real property;(j) To discriminate in the course of negotiating, executing, or financing a real estate transaction whether by mortgage, deed of trust, contract, or other instrument imposing a lien or other security in real property, or in negotiating or executing any item or service related thereto including issuance of title insurance, mortgage insurance, loan guarantee, or other aspect of the transaction. Nothing in this section shall limit the effect of RCW 49.60.176 relating to unfair practices in credit transactions; or(k) To attempt to do any of the unfair practices defined in this section.(2) For the purposes of this chapter discrimination based on the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person who is blind, deaf, or physically disabled includes:(a) A refusal to permit, at the expense of the person with a disability, reasonable modifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by such person if such modifications may be necessary to afford such person full enjoyment of the dwelling, except that, in the case of a rental, the landlord may, where it is reasonable to do so, condition permission for a modification on the renter agreeing to restore the interior of the dwelling to the condition that existed before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted;(b) To refuse to make reasonable accommodation in rules, policies, practices, or services when such accommodations may be necessary to afford a person with the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability and/or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person who is blind, deaf, or physically disabled equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or(c) To fail to design and construct covered multifamily dwellings and premises in conformance with the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.) and all other applicable laws or regulations pertaining to access by persons with any sensory, mental, or physical disability or use of a trained dog guide or service animal. Whenever the requirements of applicable laws or regulations differ, the requirements which require greater accessibility for persons with any sensory, mental, or physical disability shall govern.Nothing in (a) or (b) of this subsection shall apply to: (i) A single-family house rented or leased by the owner if the owner does not own or have an interest in the proceeds of the rental or lease of more than three such single-family houses at one time, the rental or lease occurred without the use of a salesperson, or a broker as defined in RCW 18.85.011, and the rental or lease occurred without the publication, posting, or mailing of any advertisement, sign, or statement in violation of subsection (1)(g) of this section; or (ii) rooms or units in dwellings containing living quarters occupied or intended to be occupied by no more than four families living independently of each other if the owner maintains and occupies one of the rooms or units as his or her residence.(3) It is an unfair practice for a real estate licensee to market the sale or lease of residential real estate to a limited or exclusive group of prospective buyers, prospective tenants, or real estate licensees, or any combination thereof, unless the real estate is concurrently marketed to the general public and all other real estate licensees, except as reasonably necessary to protect the health or safety of the owner or occupant.(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall not be an unfair practice or a denial of civil rights for any public or private educational institution to separate the sexes or give preference to or limit use of dormitories, residence halls, or other student housing to persons of one sex or to make distinctions on the basis of marital or families with children status.(((4)))(5) Except pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, this section shall not be construed to require structural changes, modifications, or additions to make facilities accessible to a person with a disability except as otherwise required by law. Nothing in this section affects the rights, responsibilities, and remedies of landlords and tenants pursuant to chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW, including the right to post and enforce reasonable rules of conduct and safety for all tenants and their guests, provided that chapters 59.18 and 59.20 RCW are only affected to the extent they are inconsistent with the nondiscrimination requirements of this chapter. Nothing in this section limits the applicability of any reasonable federal, state, or local restrictions regarding the maximum number of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling.(((5)))(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall not be an unfair practice for any public establishment providing for accommodations offered for the full enjoyment of transient guests as defined by RCW 9.91.010(1)(c) to make distinctions on the basis of families with children status. Nothing in this section shall limit the effect of RCW 49.60.215 relating to unfair practices in places of public accommodation.(((6)))(7) Nothing in this chapter prohibiting discrimination based on families with children status applies to housing for older persons as defined by the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3607(b)(1) through (3), as amended by the housing for older persons act of 1995, P.L. 104-76, as enacted on December 28, 1995. Nothing in this chapter authorizes requirements for housing for older persons different than the requirements in the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3607(b)(1) through (3), as amended by the housing for older persons act of 1995, P.L. 104-76, as enacted on December 28, 1995.(((7)))(8) Nothing in this chapter shall apply to real estate transactions involving the sharing of a dwelling unit, or rental or sublease of a portion of a dwelling unit, when the dwelling unit is to be occupied by the owner or subleasor. For purposes of this section, "dwelling unit" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.18.030.--- END ---